Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.220

Administration by department and board. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The department of revenue and the community economic revitalization board may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW they consider necessary for the administration of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 229 s 13.]

NOTES:

Application—Severability—2007 c 229: See notes following RCW 39.102.020.